Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2671.
Purpose.

It is the policy of the State of Vermont to protect and promote the public interest by:

Insuring the citizens of this State and the general public an adequate supply of pure fresh milk and other dairy products of constantly improving quality.

Establishing such appropriate dairy laws, regulations, and administrative procedures, as will protect the public health and welfare.

Improving the economy of the State and the welfare of dairy farmers and milk handlers by improving the competitive position of the dairy industry and increasing the consumption of milk and other dairy products.

Securing uniformity in dairy standards, labeling, and sanitary procedures, and developing milk markets by cooperating and coordinating with the appropriate dairy agencies of other states and the federal government to the extent consistent with the interest of the State of Vermont.

It is essential, in order to assure the continued production of milk and its handling and distribution, that prices to producers be such as to return reasonable cost of production and at the same time assure an adequate supply of milk and dairy products to consumers at reasonable prices; and to these ends it is essential that consumers and others be adequately informed as to the dietary needs and advantages of milk and dairy products and as to the economics resulting from the use of milk and dairy products, and to command for milk and dairy products consumer attention and demand consistent with their importance and value. It is further declared that continued decline in the consumption of fluid milk and some other dairy products will jeopardize the production of adequate supplies of milk and dairy products because of increasing surpluses necessarily returning less to producers; and that continued adequate supplies of milk and dairy products is a matter of vital concern as affecting the health and general welfare of the people of this State. It is therefore declared to be the legislative intent and policy of the State:

to enable milk producers and others in the dairy industry, with the aid of the State, to more effectively promote the consumption of milk and dairy products;

to provide methods and means for the development of new and improved dairy products, and to promote their use; and

to this end, to eliminate the possible impairment of the purchasing power of the milk producers of this State and to assure an adequate supply of milk for consumers at reasonable prices.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 1; amended

1979, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1981, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 22, 1982.

§ 2672.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

“Secretary” means Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or his or her authorized agent.

“Milk producer” or “producer” is a person, partnership, unincorporated association, or corporation who owns or controls one or more cows, dairy goats, dairy sheep, or water buffalo and sells or offers for sale a part or all of the milk produced by the animals.

“Dairy farm” is any place or premise where one or more cows, dairy goats, dairy sheep, or water buffalo are kept and where a part or all of the milk from the animals is sold or offered for sale.

“Milk plant” is any place, premise, or establishment where milk or dairy products are collected, assembled, handled, processed, stored, pasteurized, packaged, or prepared for distribution.

“Milk handler” or “handler” is a person, firm, unincorporated association, or corporation engaged in the business of buying, selling, assembling, packaging, or processing milk or other dairy products, for sale within or without the State of Vermont. “Milk handler” or “handler” shall not mean a milk producer.

“Milk handler license” is a license issued by the Secretary which authorizes the licensee to carry on the business of a milk handler.

“Milk,” unless preceded or succeeded by an explanatory term, means the pure lacteal secretion of dairy cattle. Milk from other dairy livestock listed in this subdivision shall be preceded by the common name for the type of livestock that produced the milk. Such milk may be standardized by the addition of pure, fresh skim milk or cream as defined by regulation.

“Cows’ milk” is the colostrum-free, pure, lacteal product of healthy cattle which contains not less than 11.50 percent of total milk solids (to which nothing has been added or taken away). Cows’ milk sold in retail packages shall contain not less than 3.25 percent milk fat, and not less than 8.25 percent nonfat milk solids.

“Goats’ milk” is the colostrum-free, pure, lacteal product of healthy goats which contains not less than 10 percent of total milk solids (to which nothing has been added or taken away). Goats’ milk sold in retail packages shall contain not less than 2.5 percent milk fat and not less than 7.5 percent nonfat milk solids.

“Sheep’s milk” is the colostrum-free, pure, lacteal product of healthy sheep which contains no less than 11.50 percent of total milk solids (to which nothing has been added or taken away).

“Water buffalo’s milk” is the colostrum-free, pure, lacteal product of healthy water buffalo which contains no less than 11.50 percent of total milk solids (to which nothing has been added or taken away).

“Retail package of dairy product” is a package to be sold to a consumer.

“Dairy product” is milk, or a product derived therefrom, which conforms to the appropriate legal standard or definition for the specific product as defined in this part and regulations made under this part.

“Fluid dairy products” are milk and fluid dairy products derived from milk, including cultured products, as defined by regulations adopted by federal entities and published in the Code of Federal Regulations.

“Licensed technician” is a person who has demonstrated by appropriate tests, to the satisfaction of the Secretary, that he or she has the skill, experience, ability, and integrity to perform tests that are used as a basis for payment or acceptance of dairy products, and who holds one or more licenses issued by the Secretary authorizing the person to carry on one or more of these activities.

“Approved dairy laboratory” is any place or premise which has been inspected and approved by the Secretary, or, those premises outside Vermont approved and listed by the National Conference on Interstate Milk Shipments in accordance with the most recent evaluation of milk laboratories as published by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Service, Food and Drug Administration, where tests are made on milk or dairy products to determine the quality or acceptance of the products. The laboratory shall meet recommendations as set forth in the latest edition of APHA “standard methods for the examination of dairy products.” The Secretary may terminate approval for cause.

“Adulteration” means an adulterated dairy product containing noxious, unwholesome, or deleterious material, preservative, drugs, or chemical in a quantity injurious to health; or which does not conform to the definition of the product; or which is not produced, processed, or distributed according to the provisions of this part.

“Commission” means the Vermont Milk Commission as constituted in section 2922 of this title.

“Charitable use” means the distribution of milk among poor and needy persons without charge or compensation therefor.

“Distributor” means any person who sells milk to consumers within the State, except those who sell milk for consumption on the premises.

“Market” means any area designated by the Board as a natural marketing area.

“School lunch milk” means milk sold, offered for sale or distribution at school buildings, grounds, or other places used for school purposes.

“Person” means individuals, corporations, partnerships, trusts, associations, cooperatives, and any and all other business units or entities.

“Additional definitions.” The Secretary may (after due notice and public hearing) in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, adopt, amend, or rescind definitions of other dairy products, including modified milk, dairy processes, and rules relating to specially trained personnel.

“Drug” or “drugs” mean:

articles recognized in the official U.S. Pharmacopeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or its supplement;

articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals;

articles (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or other animals; and

articles intended for use as a component of any articles specified in subdivision (A), (B), or (C) of this subdivision (21), but not including devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

Definitions and standards of milk products not defined in this section shall be those established by federal agencies and published in the Code of Federal Regulations.

“Vermont fresh milk” means milk consisting entirely of fresh milk produced in Vermont.

“Northeastern fresh milk” means milk consisting entirely of fresh milk produced in Delaware, Maryland, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, New York, Connecticut, Rhode Island, Massachusetts, Vermont, New Hampshire, or Maine.

“National Conference on Interstate Milk Shipments” means the national nonprofit organization of that same name, or its successor in interest, that deliberates and votes on proposals submitted by individuals from state or local regulatory agencies, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, the U.S. Department of Agriculture, producers, processors, and consumers who have an interest in the safety of dairy products.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 2; amended

1969, No. 73

, § 1, eff. April 18, 1969;

1971, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1973;

1979, No. 106

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1989, No. 14

;

1991, No. 17

, § 8(a) eff. April 4, 1991;

1991, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 5, 2000;

2001, No. 39

, § 2;

2003, No. 37

, § 5;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 65, eff. March 1, 2004;

2007, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 22, 2008;

2011, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 19, 2011;

2013, No. 83

, § 7, eff. June 10, 2013;

2015, No. 23

, § 74;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 2673.
Appointment of Secretary of State for service of process.

Before a license is issued under the provisions of this subchapter, the handler, if a nonresident or a foreign corporation, shall, in writing, appoint the Secretary of State its attorney upon whom service of legal process in any action or proceeding against it may be made with the same validity as if made upon the handler.
The provisions of

9 V.S.A. § 4209

and 4210 shall apply to such handler.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 20.

§ 2674.
Records and reports—Handlers.

On or before March 1 of each year, all handlers shall send the Secretary a full and accurate report of the amount of business done during the preceding year, together with such other statistical information as the Secretary may require. Failure to file requested information shall be grounds for suspension of license. If the handler purchases milk from a Vermont farm, a cooperative representing a Vermont farm, or a marketing service owned by a cooperative, the handler, in addition to any other information required by the Secretary, shall provide the following information:

the source or sources of milk purchased by the handler, and the monthly quantity purchased for each of the past 12 months;

a sworn balance sheet showing assets and liabilities and a profit and loss statement as of the end of the handler’s preceding fiscal year, and such other information regarding its financial condition as the Secretary may require; and

a statement as to when all Vermont producers will be paid in part and in full, provided that payment shall be made as agreed upon but not later than the 25th day of the following month.

A milk handler that is licensed under this chapter and that withdraws more than 57,600 gallons of groundwater per day averaged over any 30-consecutive-day period shall annually report estimated water use to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall share information reported under this section with the Agency of Natural Resources.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 21; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2007, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 9, 2008;

2013, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 2675.
Distributors.

All distributors in any market specified by the Commission as one in which it is in the public interest to regulate the supply, production, and quality of milk, shall keep such records and make such reports as the Commission may reasonably require.
All other distributors shall keep such records and make such reports as the Commission may reasonably require to keep it informed at all times as to the adequacy of such supply, production, and quality of milk.
Any member of the Commission or its representative shall have access to and may enter and examine, at all reasonable hours, all places where milk is produced, handled, distributed, or sold, and examine all books and records kept.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 49; amended

1991, No. 17

, § 8(a), eff. April 4, 1991.

§ 2676. See effective date of amendment in note set out below. Title to milk in tank truck; costs of hauling.

When milk is sampled, measured, and transferred from a farm tank to a tank truck, the milk collector shall be deemed to be the agent of the buyer and title to the milk shall be deemed to pass to the buyer at the time of such transfer.

In this section, “hauling costs” means stop charges, hauling charges, fuel surcharges, and any other costs incurred to transport cows’ milk from a farm to the buyer.
(b) (1) In this section, “hauling costs” means stop charges, hauling charges, fuel surcharges, and any other costs incurred to transport cows’ milk from a farm to the buyer.

Notwithstanding subsection 2925(d) of this title, hauling costs shall be paid by the buyer and shall not be charged back to the selling producer, either directly or indirectly. No additional charges shall be made, and no costs may be shifted from other benefits the producer receives to contravene the purpose of this subsection. No funds shall be transferred away from the producer in paid producer differentials or premiums the producer would receive but for this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 35; amended

2009, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2677.
Fluid dairy products for livestock feed.

A milk plant or handler shall not dispense or deliver fluid dairy products other than whey for livestock feed including poultry except under regulations as may be promulgated by the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 36; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 19, 2011.

§ 2678.
Penalties.

Any handler, producer, or other person who violates any of the provisions of this part or the regulations promulgated thereunder, shall be fined not less than $25.00 or more than $1,000.Food

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 75.

§ 2679.
Administrative penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter may be assessed an administrative penalty under section 15 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 2680.
Labeling milk as fresh.

Milk shall not be labeled as “fresh milk,” “Vermont fresh milk,” or “northeastern fresh milk” unless the milk meets the definitions in section 2672 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 22, 2008.

§ 2681.
Additives.

The Secretary may, in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, adopt a list of food grade additives which may be added to milk. The additives used in milk sold in retail packages shall be conspicuously stated in descending order of volume on the label of the package in a manner approved by the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 19, 2011; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 75.